District of Columbia statutes.
1-605.04

Publication of decisions.

The Board shall cause a copy of each order, decision, or opinion rendered by it to be published in the District of Columbia Register within 60 days of its issuance.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 504, 25 DCR 5740
Election campaigns, conflict of interest, disclosure, see § 1-1106.02.
Employee deferred compensation programs, collective bargaining agreements, review, see § 47-3601.
Merit system, abolishment of positions for fiscal year 2000, see § 1-624.08.
Merit system, educational service, rules and regulations, see § 1-608.01a.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-605.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-335.4.